Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.308

School district organization changes—Adjustment of school district assets and liabilities—School districts in two or more educational service districts.

The duties in this chapter imposed upon and required to be performed by a regional committee and by an educational service district superintendent in connection with a change in the organization and extent of school districts and/or with the adjustment of the assets and liabilities of school districts and with all matters related to such change or adjustment whenever territory lying in more than one educational service district is involved shall be performed by the regional committee and by the superintendent of the educational service district in which is located the part of the proposed or enlarged school district having the largest number of common school pupils residing therein. Proposals for changes in the organization and extent of school districts and proposed terms of adjustment of assets and liabilities thus prepared and approved shall be submitted to the superintendent of public instruction.

[ 2008 c 159 s 6; 2006 c 263 s 612; 1985 c 385 s 25; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 95; 1973 c 47 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 131; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.240. Prior: 1947 c 266 s 26; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-45. Formerly RCW 28A.323.020, 28A.315.360, 28A.57.240, 28.57.240.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1985 c 385: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Severability—1973 c 47: See note following RCW 28A.323.010.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.